Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF876.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 558A.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsections: NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. âLead service lineâ means a service line which is made of lead. A galvanized service line is considered a lead service line if the line ever was or is currently downstream of any lead service line or service line of unknown material. For the purposes of this subsection, âdownstreamâ means the section of the service line between a lead service line and the water meter. NEW SUBSECTION . 4A. âService lineâ means the pipe connecting the water main to the interior plumbing in a building. For the purposes of this subsection, âservice lineâ includes the pipe from the water main to the water meter, not including interior plumbing. Sec. 2. Section 558A.4, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: a. The disclosure statement shall include information relating to the condition and important characteristics of the property and structures located on the property, including significant defects in the structural integrity of the structure and the presence of lead service lines , as provided in rules which shall be adopted by the real estate commission House File 876, p. 2 pursuant to section 543B.9 . The rules may require the disclosure to include information relating to the propertyâs zoning classification; the condition of plumbing, heating, or electrical systems; or the presence of pests. Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 876, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor